Montana, session 2025, LC1234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Short title. [Sections 1 through 7] may be cited as the "Montana Child
Care Savings Account Act".

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 through 7], unless the context
requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Account administrator" means:
(a) a state or federally chartered bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or trust
company;
(b) a certified public accountant licensed to practice in this state pursuant to Title 37, chapter 50;
(c) the account holder or an employee for whose benefit the account in question is established;
(d) a broker, insurance producer, or investment adviser regulated by the commissioner of
insurance;
(e) an attorney licensed to practice law in this state; or
(f) a person who is an enrolled agent allowed to practice before the United States internal revenue
service.
(2) "Account holder" means an individual who is a resident of this state and who establishes a child
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1234.1
care savings account.
(3) "Child care savings account" or "account" means an account established with an account
administrator in this state pursuant to [section 3].
(4) "Consumer price index" means the consumer price index, United States city average, for all
items, for all urban consumers, as published by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of
labor.
(5) "Dependent child" means a qualifying individual as defined in section 21 of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 21.
(6) "Eligible child care expense" means employment-related expenses as defined in section 21 of
the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 21.
(7) "Employee" means an employed individual for whose benefit or for the benefit of whose
dependents a child care savings account is established. The term includes a self-employed individual.
(8) "Immediate family member" means a parent, spouse, or child.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Establishment of account. (1) An employer, except as otherwise
provided by statute, contract, or a collective bargaining agreement, may establish a child care savings account
for an employee of the employer.
(2) An individual who is a resident of this state may establish a child care savings account for that
individual.
(3) Before making any contributions to an employee's account, an employer shall inform an
employee in writing of the state and federal tax status of contributions made pursuant to this chapter.
(4) On agreement between an employer and an employee, an employee may have the employer
contribute to the employee's child care savings account.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Tax exemption -- conditions. (1) Except as provided in this section, the
amount of principal provided for in subsection (2) contributed annually by an employee or account holder to an
account and all interest or other income on the principal may be excluded from the Montana taxable income of
the employee or account holder and is exempt from taxation, in accordance with 15-30-2120, as long as the
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1234.1
principal and interest or other income is contained within the account or withdrawn only for payment of eligible
child care expenses or for paying the expenses of administering the account. Any part of the principal or
income, or both, withdrawn from an account may not be excluded under subsection (2) and this subsection (1)
if the amount is withdrawn from the account and used for a purpose other than an eligible child care expense or
for paying the expenses of administering the account.
(2) (a) An employee or account holder may annually contribute the greater of:
(i) $5,000; or
(ii) an amount determined for each tax year after 2026 by multiplying the amount in subsection
(2)(a)(i) by an inflation factor determined by dividing the consumer price index fund for June of the previous tax
year by the consumer price index for June 2025 and rounding the resulting figure to the nearest $100
increment.
(b) There is no limitation on the amount of funds and interest or other income on those funds that
may be retained tax-free within an account.
(3) The transfer of money in an account owned by one employee or account holder to the account
of another employee or account holder who is an immediate family member of the first employee or account
holder does not subject either employee or account holder to tax liability under this section. Amounts contained
within the account of the receiving employee or account holder are subject to the requirements and limitations
provided in this section.
(4) The employee or account holder who establishes the account is the owner of the account. An
employee or account holder may withdraw money in an account and deposit the money in another account with
a different account administrator or with the same account administrator without incurring tax liability.
(5) Within 30 days of being furnished proof of the death of the employee or account holder, the
account administrator shall distribute the principal and accumulated interest or other income in the account to
the estate of the employee or account holder or to a designated pay-on-death beneficiary as provided in 72-6-
223. An immediate family member who receives the distribution provided for in this subsection becomes the
account holder and may:
(a) within 1 year of the death of the employee or account holder from which the account was
inherited, withdraw funds for eligible child care expenses incurred by the deceased; and
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1234.1
(b) contribute to the account, retain money in the account tax-free, and withdraw funds from the
account as provided in this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Withdrawal of funds from account for purposes other than eligible
child care expenses. (1) An employee or account holder may withdraw money from the individual's child care
savings account for any purpose other than an eligible child care expense or for paying the expenses of
administering the account only on the last business day of the account administrator's business year. Money
withdrawn from an account pursuant to this subsection that had been excluded from taxation must be taxed as
ordinary income of the employee or account holder.
(2) There is a penalty equal to 10% of the amount of a withdrawal for a withdrawal other than for
eligible child care expenses or for expenses of administering the account or other than on the last business day
of the account administrator's business year. The account administrator may withhold the penalty from the
amount of the withdrawal and, on behalf of the employee or account holder, pay the penalty to the department.
Payments made to the department pursuant to this section must be deposited in the general fund. Money
withdrawn from an account pursuant to this subsection must be taxed as ordinary income of the employee or
account holder if it had been excluded from taxation.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "last business day of the account administrator's business
year", as applied to an account administrator who is also the account holder or an employee, means the last
weekday in December.

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Administration of account. (1) (a) An account administrator shall
administer the child care savings account from which the payment of claims is made and, except as provided in
subsection (1)(b), has a fiduciary duty to the person for whose benefit the account is administered.
(b) Except for reporting and remitting of penalties to the department of revenue, a financial
institution shall administer a child care savings account and has the same rights and duties pertaining to the
account as the person for whose benefit the account is administered. A financial institution may provide
investment options to each employee and account holder, including a regular deposit account, share account,
stock account, bond account, mutual fund account, or a combination of these accounts. Notwithstanding any
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1234.1
other provision of this chapter, a financial institution is not responsible for:
(i) losses that are based on an investment option that is selected by an employee or account
holder; and
(ii) determining whether a child care expense is eligible or nonreimbursable or for the use or
application of funds if the employee or account holder attests that withdrawals are for eligible and
nonreimbursable child care expenses.
(2) Not more than 30 days after an account administrator begins to administer an account, the
account administrator shall notify in writing each employee and account holder on whose behalf the account
administrator administers an account of the date of the last business day of the account administrator's
business year.
(3) An account administrator may use funds held in a child care savings account only for the
purpose of paying eligible child care expenses or for paying the expenses of administering the account.
(4) The employee or account holder may submit documentation of eligible child care expenses
paid by the employee or account holder in the tax year to the account administrator, and the account
administrator shall reimburse the employee or account holder from the employee's or account holder's account
for eligible child care expenses. The burden of proving that a withdrawal from a child care savings account was
made for an eligible child care expense is on the employee or account holder and not on the account
administrator or the employer of the employee or account holder.
(5) The employee or account holder shall annually report to the department the starting balance
and ending balance of a child care savings account.
(6) If an employer makes contributions to a child care savings account on a periodic installment
basis, the employer may advance to an employee, interest free, an amount necessary to cover child care
expenses incurred that exceeds the amount in the employee's child care savings account at the time that the
expense is incurred if the employee agrees to repay the advance from future installments or when the
employee ceases employment with the employer.
(7) In the case of an account administrator who is also the account holder or an employee:
(a) notice by the account administrator to the employee or account holder pursuant to subsection
(2) is not required;
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1234.1
(b) the account administrator may not use funds held in an account to pay the expenses of
administering the account, except that a service fee may be deducted from the account by a financial institution
or other holder of the account;
(c) documentation of eligible child care expenses must be maintained but is not required to be
submitted to the account administrator;
(d) contributions to a child care savings account must be established in a separate account and be
segregated from other funds;
(e) the employee or account holder is subject to the same yearend reporting requirements as all
other account administrators; and
(f) the employee or account holder is required to forward the 10% penalty on funds withdrawn for
noneligible child care expenses to the state.

NEW SECTION. Section 7. False claims prohibited -- penalty. (1) A person may not knowingly
prepare or cause to be prepared a false claim, receipt, statement, or billing to justify the withdrawal of money
from an account.
(2) (a) A person who violates subsection (1) by preparing or causing the preparation of a false
claim, receipt, statement, or billing in an amount not exceeding $300 is guilty of theft and on conviction shall be
fined an amount not to exceed $500 or be imprisoned in the county jail for a term not to exceed 6 months, or
both.
(b) A person convicted of a second offense shall be fined $500 or be imprisoned in the county jail
for a term not to exceed 6 months, or both.
(c) A person convicted of a third or subsequent offense shall be fined $1,000 and be imprisoned in
the county jail for a term of not less than 30 days or more than 6 months.
(3) A person who violates subsection (1) by preparing or causing the preparation of a false claim,
receipt, statement, or billing in an amount of $300 or more is guilty of theft and on conviction shall be fined an
amount not to exceed $50,000 or be imprisoned in the state prison for a term not to exceed 10 years, or both.

Section 8. Section 15-30-2120, MCA, is amended to read:
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1234.1
"15-30-2120. Adjustments to federal taxable income to determine Montana taxable income. (1)
The items in subsection (2) are added to and the items in subsection (3) are subtracted from federal taxable
income to determine Montana taxable income.
(2) The following are added to federal taxable income:
(a) to the extent that it is not exempt from taxation by Montana under federal law, interest from
obligations of a territory or another state or any political subdivision of a territory or another state and exempt-
interest dividends attributable to that interest except to the extent already included in federal taxable income;
(b) that portion of a shareholder's income under subchapter S. of Chapter 1 of the Internal
Revenue Code that has been reduced by any federal taxes paid by the subchapter S. corporation on the
income;
(c) depreciation or amortization taken on a title plant as defined in 33-25-105;
(d) the recovery during the tax year of an amount deducted in any prior tax year to the extent that
the amount recovered reduced the taxpayer's Montana income tax in the year deducted;
(e) an item of income, deduction, or expense to the extent that it was used to calculate federal
taxable income if the item was also used to calculate a credit against a Montana income tax liability;
(f) a deduction for an income distribution from an estate or trust to a beneficiary that was included
in the federal taxable income of an estate or trust in accordance with sections 651 and 661 of the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 651 and 661;
(g) a withdrawal from a medical care savings account provided for in Title 15, chapter 61, used for
a purpose other than an eligible medical expense or long-term care of the employee or account holder or a
dependent of the employee or account holder;
(h) a withdrawal from a first-time home buyer savings account provided for in Title 15, chapter 63,
used for a purpose other than for eligible costs for the purchase of a single-family residence;
(i) a withdrawal from a child care savings account provided for in [sections 1 through 7], used for a
purpose other than an eligible child care expense of the employee or account holder;
(i)(j) for a taxpayer that deducts the qualified business income deduction pursuant to section 199A
of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 199A, an amount equal to the qualified business income deduction
claimed;
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1234.1
(j)(k) for an individual taxpayer that deducts state income taxes pursuant to section 164(a)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 164(a)(3), an additional amount equal to the state income tax deduction
claimed, not to exceed the amount required to reduce the federal itemized amount computed under section 161
of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 161, to the amount of the federal standard deduction allowable under
section 63(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 63(c); and
(k)(l) for a pass-through entity, estate, or trust, the amount of state income taxes deducted pursuant
to section 164(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 164(a)(3).
(3) To the extent they are included as income or gain or not already excluded as a deduction or
expense in determining federal taxable income, the following are subtracted from federal taxable income:
(a) a deduction for an income distribution from an estate or trust to a beneficiary in accordance
with sections 651 and 661 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 651 and 661, recalculated according to the
additions and subtractions in subsections (2) and (3)(b) through (3)(o);
(b) if exempt from taxation by Montana under federal law:
(i) interest from obligations of the United States government and exempt-interest dividends
attributable to that interest; and
(ii) railroad retirement benefits;
(c) (i) salary received from the armed forces by residents of Montana who are serving on active
duty in the regular armed forces and who entered into active duty from Montana;
(ii) the salary received by residents of Montana for active duty in the national guard. For the
purposes of this subsection (3)(c)(ii), "active duty" means duty performed under an order issued to a national
guard member pursuant to:
(A) Title 10, U.S.C.; or
(B) Title 32, U.S.C., for a homeland defense activity, as defined in 32 U.S.C. 901, or a contingency
operation, as defined in 10 U.S.C. 101, and the person was a member of a unit engaged in a homeland
defense activity or contingency operation.
(iii) the amount received by a beneficiary pursuant to 10-1-1201; and
(iv) all payments made under the World War I bonus law, the Korean bonus law, and the veterans'
bonus law. Any income tax that has been or may be paid on income received from the World War I bonus law,
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1234.1
Korean bonus law, and the veterans' bonus law is considered an overpayment and must be refunded upon the
filing of an amended return and a verified claim for refund on forms prescribed by the department in the same
manner as other income tax refund claims are paid.
(d) annual contributions and income in a medical care savings account provided for in Title 15,
chapter 61, and any withdrawal for payment of eligible medical expenses or for the long-term care of the
employee or account holder or a dependent of the employee or account holder;
(e) contributions or earnings withdrawn from a family education savings account provided for in
Title 15, chapter 62, or from a qualified tuition program established and maintained by another state as
provided in section 529(b)(1)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 529(b)(1)(A)(ii), for qualified
education expenses, as defined in 15-62-103, of a designated beneficiary;
(f) interest and other income related to contributions that were made prior to January 1, 2024, that
are retained in a first-time home buyer savings account provided for in Title 15, chapter 63, and any withdrawal
for payment of eligible costs for the first-time purchase of a single-family residence;
(g) for each taxpayer that has attained the age of 65, an additional subtraction of $5,500;
(h) the amount of a scholarship to an eligible student by a student scholarship organization
pursuant to 15-30-3104;
(i) a payment received by a private landowner for providing public access to public land pursuant
to Title 76, chapter 17, part 1;
(j) the amount of any refund or credit for overpayment of income taxes imposed by this state or
any other taxing jurisdiction to the extent included in gross income for federal income tax purposes but not
previously allowed as a deduction for Montana income tax purposes;
(k) the recovery during the tax year of any amount deducted in any prior tax year to the extent that
the recovered amount did not reduce the taxpayer's Montana income tax in the year deducted;
(l) the amount of the gain recognized from the sale or exchange of a mobile home park as
provided in 15-31-163;
(m) payments from the Montana end of watch trust as provided in 2-15-2041;
(n) (i) subject to subsection (9), a portion of military pensions or military retirement income as
calculated pursuant to subsection (8) that is received by a retired member of:
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1234.1
(A) the armed forces of the United States, as defined in 10 U.S.C. 101;
(B) the Montana army national guard or the army national guard of other states;
(C) the Montana air national guard or the air national guard of other states; or
(D) a reserve component, as defined in 38 U.S.C. 101, of the United States armed forces; and
(ii) subject to subsection (9), up to 50% of all income received as survivor benefits for military
service provided for in subsection (3)(n)(i)(A) through (3)(n)(i)(D); and
(o) the amount of the property tax rebate received under 15-1-2302.
(4) (a) A taxpayer who, in determining federal taxable income, has reduced the taxpayer's
business deductions:
(i) by an amount for wages and salaries for which a federal tax credit was elected under sections
38 and 51(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 38 and 51(a), is allowed to deduct the amount of the
wages and salaries paid regardless of the credit taken; or
(ii) for which a federal tax credit was elected under the Internal Revenue Code is allowed to
deduct the amount of the business expense paid when there is no corresponding state income tax credit or
deduction, regardless of the credit taken.
(b) The deductions in subsection (4)(a) must be made in the year that the wages, salaries, or
business expenses were used to compute the credit. In the case of a partnership or small business corporation,
the deductions in subsection (4)(a) must be made to determine the amount of income or loss of the partnership
or small business corporation.
(5) (a) An individual who contributes to one or more accounts established under the Montana
family education savings program or to a qualified tuition program established and maintained by another state
as provided in section 529(b)(1)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 529(b)(1)(A)(ii), may reduce
taxable income by the lesser of $3,000 or the amount of the contribution. In the case of married taxpayers, each
spouse is entitled to a reduction, not in excess of $3,000, for the spouses' contributions to the accounts.
Spouses may jointly elect to treat half of the total contributions made by the spouses as being made by each
spouse. The reduction in taxable income under this subsection (5)(a) applies only with respect to contributions
to an account of which the account owner is the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, or the taxpayer's child or
stepchild if the taxpayer's child or stepchild is a Montana resident. The provisions of subsection (2)(d) do not
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1234.1
apply with respect to withdrawals of contributions that reduced federal taxable income.
(b) Contributions made pursuant to this subsection (5) are subject to the recapture tax provided for
in 15-62-208.
(6) (a) An individual who contributes to one or more accounts established under the Montana
achieving a better life experience program or to a qualified program established and maintained by another
state may reduce taxable income by the lesser of $3,000 or the amount of the contribution. In the case of
married taxpayers, each spouse is entitled to a reduction, not to exceed $3,000, for the spouses' contributions
to the accounts. Spouses may jointly elect to treat one-half of the total contributions made by the spouses as
being made by each spouse. The reduction in taxable income under this subsection (6)(a) applies only with
respect to contributions to an account for which the account owner is the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, or
the taxpayer's child or stepchild if the taxpayer's child or stepchild is a Montana resident. The provisions of
subsection (2)(d) do not apply with respect to withdrawals of contributions that reduced taxable income.
(b) Contributions made pursuant to this subsection (6) are subject to the recapture tax provided in
53-25-118.
(7) By November 1 of each year, the department shall multiply the subtraction from federal taxable
income for a taxpayer that has attained the age of 65 contained in subsection (3)(g) by the inflation factor for
that tax year, rounding the result to the nearest $10. The resulting amount is effective for that tax year and must
be used as the basis for the subtraction from federal taxable income determined under subsection (3)(g).
(8) (a) Subject to subsection (9), the subtraction in subsection (3)(n)(i) is equal to the lesser of:
(i) the amount of Montana source wage income on the return; or
(ii) 50% of the taxpayer's military pension or military retirement income.
(b) For the purposes of subsection (8)(a)(i), "Montana source wage income" means:
(i) wages, salary, tips, and other compensation for services performed in the state;
(ii) net income from a trade, business, profession, or occupation carried on in the state; and
(iii) net income from farming activities carried on in the state.
(9) The subtractions in subsection (3)(n):
(a) may only be claimed by a person who:
(i) becomes a resident of the state after June 30, 2023; or
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC1234.1
(ii) was a resident of the state before receiving military pension or military retirement income and
remained a resident after receiving military pension or military retirement income;
(b) may only be claimed for 5 consecutive years after satisfying the provisions of subsection (9)(a);
and
(c) are not available if a taxpayer claimed the exemption before becoming a nonresident.
(Subsection (3)(o) terminates June 30, 2025--sec. 10, Ch. 47, L. 2023; subsections (3)(n), (8), and (9) terminate
December 31, 2033--sec. 4, Ch. 650, L. 2023.)"

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 through 7] are intended to be
codified as an integral part of Title 15, chapter 30, and the provisions of Title 15, chapter 30, apply to [sections
1 through 7].

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Applicability. [This act] applies to income tax years beginning after
December 31, 2025.
- END -
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – ****